Indiana, session 2026, HB1123.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-2-27.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 27.3. Prohibition of the Use of Public Money in
Prostitution Investigations
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "law enforcement agency" has
the meaning set forth in IC 5-2-17-2.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "law enforcement officer" has
the meaning set forth in IC 5-2-1-2.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "other sexual conduct" has the
meaning set forth in IC 35-31.5-2-221.5.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "public funds" has the meaning
set forth in IC 5-13-4-20.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "sexual intercourse" has the
meaning set forth in IC 35-31.5-2-302.
Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), after June 30,
2026, a law enforcement agency may not authorize the use of
2026 IN 1123—LS 6501/DI 116


public funds by a law enforcement officer to pay for or engage in,
sexual intercourse, other sexual conduct, or the fondling of the law
enforcement officer's or another individual's genitals as part of an
investigation of crimes committed under:
(1) IC 35-45-4-2 (prostitution);
(2) IC 35-45-4-3 (making an unlawful proposition); or
(3) IC 35-45-4-4 as a Level 5 felony (promoting prostitution).
(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to an investigation of human
and sexual trafficking under IC 35-42-3.5.
SECTION 2. IC 35-31.5-2-185, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 85, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 185. (a) "Law enforcement officer" means:
(1) a police officer (including a tribal police officer, a correctional
police officer, and a hospital police officer employed by a hospital
police department established under IC 16-18-4), sheriff,
constable, marshal, prosecuting attorney, special prosecuting
attorney, special deputy prosecuting attorney, the securities
commissioner, the state fire marshal, the executive director of the
department of homeland security, or the inspector general;
(2) a deputy of any of those persons;
(3) an investigator for a prosecuting attorney or for the inspector
general;
(4) a conservation officer;
(5) an enforcement officer of the alcohol and tobacco
commission;
(6) an enforcement officer of the securities division of the office
of the secretary of state;
(7) a gaming agent employed under IC 4-33-4.5 or a gaming
control officer employed by the gaming control division under
IC 4-33-20; or
(8) a fire investigator of the department of homeland security.
(b) "Law enforcement officer", for purposes of IC 35-42-2-1,
includes an alcoholic beverage enforcement officer, as set forth in
IC 35-42-2-1.
(c) "Law enforcement officer", for purposes of IC 35-45-15,
includes a federal enforcement officer, as set forth in IC 35-45-15-3.
(d) "Law enforcement officer", for purposes of IC 35-42-4-15,
IC 35-44.1-3-1, and IC 35-44.1-3-2, includes a school resource officer
(as defined in IC 20-26-18.2-1) and a school corporation police officer
appointed under IC 20-26-16.
(e) "Law enforcement officer", for purposes of IC 35-40.5, has the
meaning set forth in IC 35-40.5-1-1.
2026 IN 1123—LS 6501/DI 116


SECTION 3. IC 35-42-4-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) Except as provided in subsection (d), a law
enforcement officer who knowingly or intentionally:
(1) engages in sexual intercourse or other sexual conduct (as
defined in IC 35-31.5-2-221.5) with an individual;
(2) has an individual fondle or agree to fondle the genitals of
the law enforcement officer; or
(3) fondles the genitals of an individual;
under any of the circumstances described in subsection (b)
commits unlawful sexual conduct by a law enforcement officer, a
Level 5 felony.
(b) To be considered unlawful sexual conduct by a law
enforcement officer, the acts described in subsection (a)(1) through
(a)(3) must occur under any of the following circumstances:
(1) In the same encounter in which an act described in
subsection (a)(1) through (a)(3) occurs, the law enforcement
officer contacts the individual for the purpose of law
enforcement or contacts the individual in the exercise of the
law enforcement officer's employment activities or duties.
(2) The law enforcement officer knows that the individual is,
or causes the individual to believe that the individual is, the
subject of an active investigation and the law enforcement
officer uses that knowledge to further engage in an act
described in subsection (a)(1) through (a)(3) with the
individual.
(3) In furtherance of an act described in subsection (a)(1)
through (a)(3), the law enforcement officer makes any show
of real or apparent law enforcement authority.
(c) It is not a defense to this section that the individual consented
to an act described in subsection (a)(1) through (a)(3).
(d) This section does not apply to an act described in subsection
(a)(3) that incurs incident to a lawful search.
2026 IN 1123—LS 6501/DI 116